Connecticut, session 2026, SB00026.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
That the sum of ____ dollars be appropriated to the Office of Policy
and Management, from the General Fund, for the fiscal year ending June
30, 2027, for reimbursement to each municipality for any increase in
election administration costs because of early voting.